Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB366.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3020. Compensation to volunteer fire companies for outages of 911 systems.(a) Compensation.--A local exchange telecommunications company with a system failure that results in an outage of a 911 system shall compensate a volunteer fire company that is required to physically maintain a volunteer firefighter at the company's fire station as a result of the outage. The compensation rate under this subsection shall be $1,000 for each hour a volunteer fire company is required to physically maintain a volunteer firefighter at the company's fire station as a 123456789101112131415161718 result of the outage.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"911 system." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 5302 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer firefighter." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7412 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0366PN0322 - 2 - 1234567891011